Washington statutes.
RCW 39.80.060

Procurement of architectural and engineering services—Exception for emergency work.

(1) This chapter need not be complied with by any agency when the contracting authority makes a finding in accordance with this or any other applicable law that an emergency requires the immediate execution of the work involved.

(2) Nothing in this chapter shall relieve the contracting authority from complying with applicable law limiting emergency expenditures.

[ 1981 c 61 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 61: See note following RCW 39.80.010.